Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2,288.02
Regulatory authority; inspection intervals.

The regulatory authority may increase the interval between inspections beyond six months if the food establishment is assigned a less frequent inspection frequency based on a written risk-based inspection schedule that is being uniformly applied throughout the jurisdiction.

Laws 1999, LB 474, § 18.